Louisiana, session 2026, SB504.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:2925(A)(2) and (4) through (7) are hereby amended and reenacted
and R.S. 17:2925(A)(8) and (9) and (D), and 3996(B)(92) are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§2925. Individual graduation plans
A.(1) * * *
(2)(a) By Except as provided in Subparagraph (b) of this Paragraph, by
the end of the eighth grade, each student's Individual Graduation Plan or the student's
Individualized Education Program, if applicable, shall list the required core courses
to be taken through the tenth grade and shall identify the courses to be taken in the
first year of high school. Students who fail to meet the standard for promotion to the
ninth grade, pursuant to policies adopted by the State Board of Elementary and
Secondary Education, shall have any necessary remedial courses included in their
Individual Graduation Plan.
(b)(i) A charter school that terminates in the eighth grade shall provide
written notice to each eighth grade student and his parent or legal guardian of
the purpose of an Individual Graduation Plan, an explanation of the different
types of high school diplomas, and the courses required for each type of diploma
so that the student is prepared to complete his plan with the list of required
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 504 ENROLLED
courses to be taken upon the student's enrollment in high school but no later
than October first of the student's ninth grade year.
(ii) A charter school that terminates in the eighth grade may partner
with a high school that an eighth grade student plans to attend for assistance in
providing for the student's Individual Graduation Plan or Individualized
Education Program, if applicable, as provided in Subparagraph (a) of this
Paragraph.
* * *
(4) The parent or legal guardian of a student entering into the eleventh
grade may request the student's Individual Graduation Plan or the student's
Individualized Education Program, if applicable, be updated.
(5) Each student, with the assistance of his parent or legal guardian and
school counselor, shall be offered available vocational training opportunities.
(4)(6) The Individual Graduation Plan shall be sufficiently flexible to allow
the student to, with the written approval of a parent or legal guardian, change his
program of study, yet be sufficiently structured to ensure that the student will meet
the high school graduation requirements for his chosen major or the requirements of
the student's Individualized Education Program, if applicable, and be qualified for
admission to a postsecondary education institution or to enter the workforce.
(5)(7) Each student's Individual Graduation Plan shall be reviewed annually
and revised as necessary to identify the courses to be taken each year until all
required core courses are completed.
(6)(8) Upon completion of the review, the plan shall be signed by the student,
his parent or legal guardian, and the school counselor.
(7)(9) Prior to revising a student's Individual Graduation Plan, the school
counselor shall meet with the student's parent or legal guardian either in person or
virtually to explain the possible impacts the revisions to the plan might have on the
student's graduation requirements and postsecondary education goals. Any revisions
to a student's plan shall be approved in writing by the student's parent or legal
guardian.
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 504 ENROLLED
* * *
D. To effectuate the provisions of this Section, schools shall use existing
school staff and counselors and any other available resources.
* * *
§3996. Charter schools; exemptions; requirements
* * *
B. Notwithstanding any state law, rule, or regulation to the contrary and
except as may be otherwise specifically provided for in an approved charter, a
charter school established and operated in accordance with the provisions of this
Chapter and its approved charter and the school's officers and employees shall be
exempt from all statutory mandates or other statutory requirements that are
applicable to public schools and to public school officers and employees except for
the following laws otherwise applicable to public schools with the same grades:
* * *
(92) Individual graduation plans, R.S. 17:2925.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.